Utah statutes.
63M-7-522.   Emergency award.
If the reparations officer determines that the claimant will suffer financial
hardship unless an emergency award is made, and it appears likely that a final
award will be made, an amount may be paid to the claimant, to be deducted from
the final award or repaid by and recoverable from the claimant to the extent
that it exceeds the final award.  The board may limit emergency awards to any
amount it considers necessary.
